Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2405
Brokerage relationship, defined.

Brokerage relationship shall mean the relationship created between a
designated broker and a client pursuant to sections 76-2401 to 76-2430 relating
to the performance of services of a broker as defined in section 81-885.01
and shall also mean the relationship created between the client and the designated
broker's affiliated licensees pursuant to sections 76-2401 to 76-2430.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB25, § 3.

Unless otherwise specified in a written agency agreement pursuant to section 76-2422(6), the fiduciary duties owed by a real estate broker derive only from the performance of limited activities defined in section 81-885.01(2). Professional Mgmt. Midwest v. Lund Co., 284 Neb. 777, 826 N.W.2d 225 (2012).

When a client engages a real estate broker to perform any of the activities defined in section 81-885.01(2), the resulting agency relationship is called a brokerage relationship. Professional Mgmt. Midwest v. Lund Co., 284 Neb. 777, 826 N.W.2d 225 (2012).